Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1217.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Lieutenant Colonel Kenneth O. Hunter Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Kenneth Orville Hunter was born July 13, 1920, in Philadelphia.(2) At 23 years of age, in 1943, Lieutenant Colonel Hunter joined the United States Army Air Corps as a Second Lieutenant.(3) Lieutenant Colonel Hunter served in the European Theater of Operations during World War II.(4) Lieutenant Colonel Hunter earned the Bronze Star and the Flying Cross in his service.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Lieutenant Colonel Hunter helped fly medical personnel from Australia to London to assist with the care of a dying General Patton.(6) After World War II, Lieutenant Colonel Hunter was a flight instructor and taught a class on Aerobatics Theory of Flight and Weather.(7) In 1989, Lieutenant Colonel Hunter was honorably discharged from the United States Air Force as a Lieutenant Colonel.(8) In his free time, Lieutenant Colonel Hunter wrote an article published in "A Free Ballot for a Free Country."(9) In 1943, Lieutenant Colonel Hunter married Gertrude Hale.(10) Lieutenant Colonel Hunter and his wife adopted a son, Kenneth Hunter, who is married to Patricia Ann Hunter.(11) Lieutenant Colonel Hunter's granddaughter is Kaitlyn Hunter.(b) Designation.--The bridge identified as Bridge Key 7591, carrying State Route 2043 over the SEPTA West Trenton Line, Bensalem Township, Bucks County, is designated as the Lieutenant Colonel Kenneth O. Hunter Memorial Bridge.(c) The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1217PN1518 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526